Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1261] FOOD BANKS PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue Minnesota food banks special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, along with any other fees required under this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) contributes a minimum of $40 annually to the food bank assistance account; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of children, youth, and families, must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the inscription "Support Food Banks." new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriations. new text end new text begin (a) Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (4), must be deposited as follows: new text end new text begin (1) 75 percent in the food bank assistance account, which is established in the special revenue fund; and new text end new text begin (2) 25 percent in the general fund. new text end new text begin (b) An amount necessary is appropriated from the food bank assistance account to the commissioner for the costs to administer the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin (c) After the appropriation in paragraph (b), the amount remaining in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for distribution to regional food banks and Tribal governments, as defined in section 10.65, subdivision 2, in accordance with the federal The Emergency Food Assistance Program (TEFAP) formula and United States Department of Agriculture guidelines. This appropriation is available for purchase, transport, and coordination of the distribution of food and personal hygiene products to individuals and families in need. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end